trunk/apertium-hbs-slv/apertium-hbs-slv.hbs.metadix
    <!--The analyser is able to output ekavian and ijekavian analysis, based on the need of the user-->
    <!--Yat paradigms-->
    <pardef n="e_e__yat"> <!--this is to make life easier -->
      <group alt="hbs">
        <e><p><l>e</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">e</group><group var="ek">e</group></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>e</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">e</group><group var="ek">e</group></r></p></e>
      </group>
      <group alt="hbs_BS">
        <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">e</group><group var="ek">e</group></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>e</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">e</group><group var="ek">e</group></r></p></e>
      </group>
      <group alt="hbs_HR">
        <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">e</group><group var="ek">e</group></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>e</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">e</group><group var="ek">e</group></r></p></e>
      </group>
      <group alt="hbs_SR">
        <e><p><l>e</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">e</group><group var="ek">e</group></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">e</group><group var="ek">e</group></r></p></e>
      </group>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="i_je__yat">
      <group alt="hbs">
        <e><p><l>i</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">je</group><group var="ek">i</group></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>je</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">je</group><group var="ek">i</group></r></p></e>
      </group>
      <group alt="hbs_BS">
        <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">je</group><group var="ek">i</group></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>je</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">je</group><group var="ek">i</group></r></p></e>
      </group>
      <group alt="hbs_HR">
        <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">je</group><group var="ek">i</group></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>je</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">je</group><group var="ek">i</group></r></p></e>
      </group>
      <group alt="hbs_SR">
        <e><p><l>i</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">je</group><group var="ek">i</group></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>je</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">je</group><group var="ek">i</group></r></p></e>
        <e r="RL"><p><l>i</l><r><group var="ek">je</group></r></p></e>
      </group>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="e_je__yat">
      <group alt="hbs">
        <e><p><l>e</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">je</group><group var="ek">e</group></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>je</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">je</group><group var="ek">e</group></r></p></e>
      </group>
      <group alt="hbs_BS">
        <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">je</group><group var="ek">e</group></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>je</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">je</group><group var="ek">e</group></r></p></e>
      </group>
      <group alt="hbs_HR">
        <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">je</group><group var="ek">e</group></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>je</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">je</group><group var="ek">e</group></r></p></e>
      </group>
      <group alt="hbs_SR">
        <e><p><l>e</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">je</group><group var="ek">e</group></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>je</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">je</group><group var="ek">e</group></r></p></e>
        <e r="RL"><p><l>e</l><r><group var="ek">je</group></r></p></e>
      </group>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="e_ije__yat">
      <group alt="hbs">
        <e><p><l>e</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">ije</group><group var="ek">e</group></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>ije</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">ije</group><group var="ek">e</group></r></p></e>
      </group>
      <group alt="hbs_BS">
        <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">ije</group><group var="ek">e</group></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ije</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">ije</group><group var="ek">e</group></r></p></e>
      </group>
      <group alt="hbs_HR">
        <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">ije</group><group var="ek">e</group></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ije</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">ije</group><group var="ek">e</group></r></p></e>
      </group>
      <group alt="hbs_SR">
        <e><p><l>e</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">ije</group><group var="ek">e</group></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>ije</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">ije</group><group var="ek">e</group></r></p></e>
        <e r="RL"><p><l>e</l><r><group var="ek">ije</group></r></p></e>
      </group>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="e_i__yat">
      <group alt="hbs">
        <e><p><l>e</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">i</group><group var="ek">e</group></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">i</group><group var="ek">e</group></r></p></e>
      </group>
      <group alt="hbs_BS">
        <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">i</group><group var="ek">e</group></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>i</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">i</group><group var="ek">e</group></r></p></e>
      </group>
      <group alt="hbs_HR">
        <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">i</group><group var="ek">e</group></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>i</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">i</group><group var="ek">e</group></r></p></e>
      </group>
      <group alt="hbs_SR">
        <e><p><l>e</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">i</group><group var="ek">e</group></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r><group var="slavist">ě</group><group var="ijek">i</group><group var="ek">e</group></r></p></e>
        <e r="RL"><p><l>e</l><r>i</r></p></e>
      </group>
    </pardef>
    <!--this is pure forbidden magic -->
    <pardef n="e_e_left__yat">
      <group alt="hbs">
        <e><p><l>e</l><r></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>e</l><r></r></p></e>
      </group>
      <group alt="hbs_BS">
        <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l><r></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>e</l><r></r></p></e>
      </group>
      <group alt="hbs_HR">
        <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l><r></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>e</l><r></r></p></e>
      </group>
      <group alt="hbs_SR">
        <e><p><l>e</l><r></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l><r></r></p></e>
      </group>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="e_je_left__yat">
      <group alt="hbs">
        <e><p><l>e</l><r></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>je</l><r></r></p></e>
      </group>
      <group alt="hbs_BS">
        <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l><r></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>je</l><r></r></p></e>
      </group>
      <group alt="hbs_HR">
        <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l><r></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>je</l><r></r></p></e>
      </group>
      <group alt="hbs_SR">
        <e><p><l>e</l><r></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>je</l><r></r></p></e>
      </group>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="gdjegod"><i>gd</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><i>god</i><par n="danas__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ovdje"><i>ovd</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><i/><par n="danas__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="odrijemati"><i>odr</i><par n="e_ije__yat"/><i>m</i><par n="perf_iv_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="smještati"><i>sm</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><i>št</i><par n="imperf_ref_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="umiješati"><i>um</i><par n="e_ije__yat"/><i>š</i><par n="imperf_ref_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="smijati"><i>sm</i><par n="e_i__yat"/><par n="imperf_ref_si/jati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bježati"><i>b</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><i>ž</i><par n="imperf_iv_drž/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mijenjati"><i>m</i><par n="e_ije__yat"/><i>nj</i><par n="imperf_ref_bir/ati__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ubijediti"><i>ub</i><par n="e_ije__yat"/><i/><par n="perf_ref_izra/diti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dijeliti"><i>d</i><par n="e_ije__yat"/><i>l</i><par n="imperf_tv_gul/iti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="izmijeniti"><i>izm</i><par n="e_ije__yat"/><i>n</i><par n="perf_ref_ogul/iti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bilježiti"><i>b</i><par n="e_i__yat"/><i>l</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><i>ž</i><par n="imperf_tv_traž/iti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bilježiti"><i>b</i><par n="e_i__yat"/><i>l</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><i>ž</i><par n="imperf_ref_traž/iti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="opsjesti"><i>ops</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><par n="perf_tv_posje/sti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="presjeći"><i>pres</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><par n="perf_ref_povu/ći__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bijel"><p><l>najb</l><r>b</r></p><par n="e_je_left__yat"/><par n="e_ije_right__yat"/><par n="bije/l__sup__adj"/></e>
 <e lm="crnobijel"><i>crnob</i><par n="e_je_left__yat"/><par n="e_ije_right__yat"/><par n="bije/l__comp__adj"/></e>
 <e lm="crnobijel"><p><l>crnonajb</l><r>crnob</r></p><par n="e_je_left__yat"/><par n="e_ije_right__yat"/><par n="bije/l__sup__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cijel"><i>c</i><par n="e_je_left__yat"/><par n="e_ije_right__yat"/><par n="bije/l__comp__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cijel"><p><l>najc</l><r>c</r></p><par n="e_je_left__yat"/><par n="e_ije_right__yat"/><par n="bije/l__sup__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vrijedan" r="LR"><i>vr</i><par n="e_je_left__yat"/><par n="e_ije_right__yat"/><i>d</i><par n="ruž/an__comp__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vrijedan"><i>vr</i><par n="e_e_left__yat"/><par n="e_ije_right__yat"/><i>d</i><par n="ruž/an__comp__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vrijedan" r="LR"><p><l>najvr</l><r>vr</r></p><par n="e_je_left__yat"/><par n="e_ije_right__yat"/><i>d</i><par n="ruž/an__sup__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vrijedan"><p><l>najvr</l><r>vr</r></p><par n="e_e_left__yat"/><par n="e_ije_right__yat"/><i>d</i><par n="ruž/an__sup__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lijep"><i>l</i><par n="e_ije__yat"/><i>p</i><par n="mek__pst__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lijep"><i>l</i><par n="e_je_left__yat"/><par n="e_ije_right__yat"/><i>p</i><par n="mek__comp__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lijep"><p><l>najl</l><r>l</r></p><par n="e_je_left__yat"/><par n="e_ije_right__yat"/><i>p</i><par n="mek__sup__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="svijetao"><p><l>sv</l><r>sv</r></p><par n="e_je_left__yat"/><par n="e_ije_right__yat"/><i>t</i><par n="top/ao__comp__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rijedak"><p><l>r</l><r>r</r></p><par n="e_je_left__yat"/><par n="e_ije_right__yat"/><par n="sla/dak__comp__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="avioprijevoznik"><i>aviopr</i><par n="e_ije__yat"/><i>vozni</i><par n="učeni/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hljebac"><i>hl</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><par n="polju/bac__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prevara"><i>pr</i><par n="e_e__yat"/><i>var</i><par n="žen/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pjesma"><i>p</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><i>s</i><par n="pjes/ma__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vijest"><i>v</i><par n="e_ije__yat"/><i/><par n="ma/st__n"/></e>
    <e lm="istjecanje"><i>ist</i><par n="i_je__yat"/><i>canj</i><par n="polj/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ljeto"><i>l</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><i>t</i><par n="koljen/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="obilježavanje"><i>ob</i><par n="e_i__yat"/><i>l</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><i>žavanj</i><par n="polj/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="porijeklo"><i>por</i><par n="e_ije__yat"/><i>kl</i><par n="koljen/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="uljepšavanje"><i>ul</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><i>pšavanj</i><par n="polj/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="utjecaj"><i>ut</i><par n="i_je__yat"/><i>caj</i><par n="namještaj__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vrijediti"><i>vr</i><par n="e_ije__yat"/><par n="imperf_iv_ra/diti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bezbjednost"><i>v</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><i>rodostojno</i><par n="ma/st__n"/></e>
